Washington statutes.
RCW 9.38.010

False representation concerning credit.

Every person who, with intent thereby to obtain credit or financial rating, shall willfully make any false statement in writing of his or her assets or liabilities to any person with whom he or she may be either actually or prospectively engaged in any business transaction or to any commercial agency or other person engaged in the business of collecting or disseminating information concerning financial or commercial ratings, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 296; 1909 c 249 s 368; RRS s 2620.]